Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.190

Nuisance does not become legal by prescription.

No lapse of time can legalize a public nuisance, amounting to an actual obstruction of public right.

[Code 1881 s 1241; 1875 p 80 s 7; RRS s 9919.]